test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-3lex_lekkasid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - muštâliđ: # MLO, checked; check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill
    muštâliđ+V+Inf: muštâliđ
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muštâlâm
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: muštâlah
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muštâl
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: muštâleen
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: muštâlvettee
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: muštâlává
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: muštâlep
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: muštâlvetteđ
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: muštâleh
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: muštâlim
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: muštâlih
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: muštâlij
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [muštâláim, muštâlááim] 
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [muštâláid, muštâlááid]
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [muštâláin, muštâlááin]
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: muštâlijm
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: muštâlijd
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: muštâlii
    muštâliđ+V+Cond+Sg1: muštâliččim
    muštâliđ+V+Cond+Sg2: muštâliččih
    muštâliđ+V+Cond+Sg3: muštâličij
    muštâliđ+V+Cond+Du1: [muštâliččijm, muštâliččiijm]
    muštâliđ+V+Cond+Du2: [muštâliččijd, muštâliččiijd]
    muštâliđ+V+Cond+Du3: [muštâliččijn, muštâliččiijn]
    muštâliđ+V+Cond+Pl1: muštâliččijm
    muštâliđ+V+Cond+Pl2: muštâliččijd
    muštâliđ+V+Cond+Pl3: muštâliččii
    muštâliđ+V+Pot+Sg1: muštâližžeem
    muštâliđ+V+Pot+Sg2: muštâližžeeh
    muštâliđ+V+Pot+Sg3: muštâliš
    muštâliđ+V+Pot+Du1: muštâližžeen
    muštâliđ+V+Pot+Du2: muštâlišvettee
    muštâliđ+V+Pot+Du3: muštâližává
    muštâliđ+V+Pot+Pl1: muštâližžep
    muštâliđ+V+Pot+Pl2: muštâlišvetteđ
    muštâliđ+V+Pot+Pl3: muštâližeh
    muštâliđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: muštâlum
    muštâliđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: muštâl
    muštâliđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: muštâlus
    muštâliđ+V+Imprt+Du1: muštâloon
    muštâliđ+V+Imprt+Du2: muštâlee
    muštâliđ+V+Imprt+Du3: muštâlus
    muštâliđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: muštâlop
    muštâliđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: muštâliđ
    muštâliđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: muštâlus
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: muštâl
    muštâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: muštâlâm
    muštâliđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: muštâliččii 
    muštâliđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: muštâližžii
    muštâliđ+V+PrsPrc: [muštâleijee, muštâlijjee]
    muštâliđ+V+PrfPrc: muštâlâm
    muštâliđ+V+Actio: muštâlem
    muštâliđ+V+Actio+Ess: muštâlmin
    muštâliđ+V+Actio+Loc: muštâlmist
    muštâliđ+V+Actio+Ill: muštâlmân
    muštâliđ+V+Actio+Com: muštâldijn
    muštâliđ+V+VAbess: muštâlhánnáá
    

  Verb - kihtâliđ: # MLO, checked; check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill
    kihtâliđ+V+Inf: kihtâliđ
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kihtâlâm
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kihtâlah
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kihtâl
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kihtâleen
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kihtâlvettee
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kihtâlává
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kihtâlep
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kihtâlvetteđ
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kihtâleh
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kihtâlim
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kihtâlih
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kihtâlij
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [kihtâláim, kihtâlááim]
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [kihtâláid, kihtâlááid]
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [kihtâláin, kihtâlááin]
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kihtâlijm
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kihtâlijd
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kihtâlii
    kihtâliđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kihtâliččim
    kihtâliđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kihtâliččih
    kihtâliđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kihtâličij
    kihtâliđ+V+Cond+Du1: [kihtâliččijm, kihtâliččiijm]
    kihtâliđ+V+Cond+Du2: [kihtâliččijd, kihtâliččiijd]
    kihtâliđ+V+Cond+Du3: [kihtâliččijn, kihtâliččiijn]
    kihtâliđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kihtâliččijm
    kihtâliđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kihtâliččijd
    kihtâliđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kihtâliččii
    kihtâliđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kihtâližžeem
    kihtâliđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kihtâližžeeh
    kihtâliđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kihtâliš
    kihtâliđ+V+Pot+Du1: kihtâližžeen
    kihtâliđ+V+Pot+Du2: kihtâlišvettee
    kihtâliđ+V+Pot+Du3: kihtâližává
    kihtâliđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kihtâližžep
    kihtâliđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kihtâlišvetteđ
    kihtâliđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kihtâližeh
    kihtâliđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: kihtâlum
    kihtâliđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kihtâl
    kihtâliđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kihtâlus
    kihtâliđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kihtâloon
    kihtâliđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kihtâlee
    kihtâliđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kihtâlus
    kihtâliđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kihtâlop
    kihtâliđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kihtâliđ
    kihtâliđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kihtâlus
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kihtâl
    kihtâliđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kihtâlâm
    kihtâliđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kihtâliččii 
    kihtâliđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: kihtâližžii
    kihtâliđ+V+PrsPrc: [kihtâleijee, kihtâlijjee]
    kihtâliđ+V+PrfPrc: kihtâlâm
    kihtâliđ+V+Actio: kihtâlem
    kihtâliđ+V+Actio+Ess: kihtâlmin
    kihtâliđ+V+Actio+Loc: kihtâlmist
    kihtâliđ+V+Actio+Ill: kihtâlmân
    kihtâliđ+V+Actio+Com: kihtâldijn
    kihtâliđ+V+VAbess: kihtâlhánnáá




  Verb - lekkâsiđ: # MLO, checked; check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill
    lekkâsiđ+V+Inf: lekkâsiđ
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lekkâsâm
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lekkâsah
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lekkâs
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: lekkâseen
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: lekkâsvettee
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: lekkâsává
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lekkâsep
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lekkâsvetteđ
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lekkâseh
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lekkâsim
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lekkâsih
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lekkâsij
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [lekkâsáim, lekkâsááim] 
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [lekkâsáid, lekkâsááid]
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [lekkâsáin, lekkâsááin]
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lekkâsijm
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lekkâsijd
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lekkâsii
    lekkâsiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: lekkâsiččim
    lekkâsiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: lekkâsiččih
    lekkâsiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: lekkâsičij
    lekkâsiđ+V+Cond+Du1: [lekkâsiččijm, lekkâsiččiijm]
    lekkâsiđ+V+Cond+Du2: [lekkâsiččijd, lekkâsiččiijd]
    lekkâsiđ+V+Cond+Du3: [lekkâsiččijn, lekkâsiččiijn]
    lekkâsiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: lekkâsiččijm
    lekkâsiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: lekkâsiččijd
    lekkâsiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: lekkâsiččii
    lekkâsiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: lekkâsižžeem
    lekkâsiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: lekkâsižžeeh
    lekkâsiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: lekkâsiš
    lekkâsiđ+V+Pot+Du1: lekkâsižžeen
    lekkâsiđ+V+Pot+Du2: lekkâsišvettee
    lekkâsiđ+V+Pot+Du3: lekkâsižává
    lekkâsiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: lekkâsižžep
    lekkâsiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: lekkâsišvetteđ
    lekkâsiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: lekkâsižeh
    lekkâsiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: lekkâsum
    lekkâsiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: lekkâs
    lekkâsiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: lekkâsus
    lekkâsiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: lekkâsoon
    lekkâsiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: lekkâsee
    lekkâsiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: lekkâsus
    lekkâsiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: lekkâsop
    lekkâsiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: lekkâsiđ
    lekkâsiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: lekkâsus
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: lekkâs
    lekkâsiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: lekkâsâm
    lekkâsiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: lekkâsiččii 
    lekkâsiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: lekkâsižžii
    lekkâsiđ+V+PrsPrc: [lekkâseijee, lekkâsijjee]
    lekkâsiđ+V+PrfPrc: lekkâsâm
    lekkâsiđ+V+Actio: lekkâsem
    lekkâsiđ+V+Actio+Ess: lekkâsmin
    lekkâsiđ+V+Actio+Loc: lekkâsmist
    lekkâsiđ+V+Actio+Ill: lekkâsmân
    lekkâsiđ+V+Actio+Com: lekkâsdijn
    lekkâsiđ+V+VAbess: lekkâshánnáá
